New Jersey, session 221, S2914.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  A board of education may provide virtual or remote instruction to students that attend a public school that is used as a polling place on the day of any election.  For purposes of this section, any election shall have the same meaning as defined in R.S.19:1-1.  A board of education shall ensure that all students have access to a computer or to sufficient broadband, or to any other technology required prior to permitting the public school to offer virtual or remote instruction to students pursuant to this subsection. b.  A public school that is permitted to offer virtual or remote instruction to students pursuant to subsection a. shall not be required to offer a combination of in-person and virtual or remote instruction on a day of any election. c.  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-9) to the contrary, the Commissioner of Education shall allow a board of education that provides virtual or remote instruction on the day of any election, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, to apply the day of virtual or remote instruction to the 180-day requirement established pursuant to subsection a. of section 9 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-9). d.  A public school that is not being used as a polling place on the day of any election shall not be permitted to provide virtual or remote instruction to students to comply with the 180-day requirement established pursuant to subsection a. of section 9 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-9). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.